test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v3_ele_odd_kavela_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kävelä - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kävelä+V+Inf: kävelä
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kävelen
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kävelet
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kävelee
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kävelemmä
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kävelettä
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kävelhään
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kävelin
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kävelit
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: käveli
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kävelimmä
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kävelittä
     kävelä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kävelthiin
     kävelä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kävely
     kävelä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kävelty
     kävelä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kävelheet
     kävelä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: käveleevä
     kävelä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: käveleevät
     kävelä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: käveltävä
     kävelä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: käveltävät
     
     kävelä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kävelisin
     kävelä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kävelisit
     kävelä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kävelis
     kävelä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kävelisimä
     kävelä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kävelisittä
     kävelä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: käveltäis
     kävelä+V+Pass+Cond: käveltäis

     kävelä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kävele
     kävelä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kävelkkää
     
     kävelä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kävelemässä
     kävelä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kävelemästä
     kävelä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kävelemhään
     kävelä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kävelemälä
     kävelä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kävelemättä
